Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1402
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1403 to 38-1413 apply.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 92, p. 479;

C.S.1929, § 71-1301;

Laws 1931, c. 123, § 1, p. 355;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-1301;

R.S.1943, § 71-194;

Laws 1957, c. 293, § 1, p. 1052;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-194;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 557;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 152;

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 35;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1301;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 465;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 538;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 3.